Utah statutes.
53A-11-1002.   Superintendent required to notify school.

(1)  Within three days of receiving the information from the juvenile court or a law enforcement agency, the district superintendent shall notify the principal of the school the juvenile attends or last attended.

(2)  Upon receipt of the information, the principal shall:

(a)  make a notation in a secure file other than the student's permanent file; and

(b)  if the student is still enrolled in the school, notify staff members who, in his opinion, should know of the adjudication.

(3)  A person receiving information pursuant to this part may only disclose the information to other persons having both a right and a current need to know.

(4)  Access to secure files shall be limited to persons authorized to receive information under this part.



Amended by Chapter 102, 2004 General Session

